North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163A. Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act.
§§ 163A-1 through 163A-1633.
[Repealed]

Re-recodified as Chapters 120C, 138A, and 163, by Session Laws 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b). See note.

Recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provided, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification, in consultation with the State Ethics Commission, the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of State, and the new Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement.

Session Laws 2018-146, s. 3.1(a) and (b)
repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and
authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and
120C, and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3.
The Revisor was further authorized to “separate Subsections of statutory sections that existed in the former Chapters into new sections and, when necessary to organize relevant law into its proper place in the re-recodified chapters, may rearrange sentences that appeared within those subsections,” and “incorporate into the re-recodified chapters all amendments to Chapters 163, 163A, 138A, and 120C that became effective on or after April 25, 2017, other than those made by S.L. 2017-6 or by Part VIII of S.L. 2018-2.”

Session Laws 2018-146, s. 6.1, provides: “Consistent with this act, when re-recodifying as directed under this act, the Revisor is authorized to change all references to the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement to instead be references to the State Board of Elections, State Ethics Commission, or Secretary of State, as appropriate. The Revisor may modify statutory citations throughout the General Statutes, as appropriate, and may modify any references to statutory divisions, such as “Chapter,” “Subchapter,” “Article,” “Part,” “section,” and “subsection”; adjust the order of lists of multiple statutes to maintain statutory order; correct terms and conform names and titles changed by this act; eliminate duplicative references to the State Boards that result from the changes authorized by this section; and make conforming changes to catch lines and references to catch lines. The Revisor may also adjust subject and verb agreement and the placement of conjunctions. The Revisor shall consult with the Bipartisan State Board of
Elections and Ethics Enforcement, the State Board of Elections, the State Ethics Commission, and the Secretary of State, as appropriate, on this recodification.”

At the end of Chapters 120C, 138A, and 163 are tables showing comparable sections and their disposition between former Chapter 163A and the newly re-recodified Chapters 120C, 138A, and 163.

Session Laws 2018-2, s. 8(a), provides: “The General Assembly finds that the legislative intent in the enactment of S.L. 2017-6 and establishment of the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement was to continue the practice of having an independent, quasi-judicial body for elections and ethics enforcement for the State and consolidate those bodies under a single entity. The General Assembly finds that the entity enforcing these laws must have sufficient distance from political interference due to the potential for abuse of oversight of elections and ethics investigations for partisan purposes. The General Assembly further finds that appointment of a State Board member who is not affiliated with the two largest political parties will foster nonpartisan decision-making by the State Board. As such, by amending the section of the General Stat- utes establishing the membership of the State Board enacted in S.L. 2017-6, the purpose of this legislation is to implement the decision of the North Carolina Supreme Court on January 26, 2018, in
Cooper V. Berger
(No. 52PA17-2) to give the Governor executive control over the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement and to provide for representation on the State Board by unaffiliated and third- party voters.”

Session Laws 2018-2, s. 8(c), provides “Notwithstanding G.S. 163A-2, members appointed to the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and
Ethics Enforcement in 2018 shall serve a term of
office beginning March 1, 2018, and expiring
April 30, 2019, and the State Board shall hold its
first meeting in March 2018.”

Session Laws 2018-146, s. 3.1(c), repealed
the provisions of Part XIII of Session Laws
2018-2, including s. 8(a), (c) of that act, effective January 31, 2019.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 163A-1

through 163A-6, pertaining to the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics
Enforcement, as enacted by Session Laws 2017-6, s. 4(c), and as amended, in G.S. 163A-2, by Session
Laws 2018-2, s. 8(b), and Session Laws 2018-13, s.
5, was repealed by Session Laws 2018-146, s. 3.1(b)-(d),
effective January 31, 2019.

Former G.S. 163A-1304, pertaining to the
calculation of scheduled voting hours for absentee
ballots, was repealed by Session Laws 2018-112, s.
3, effective June 27, 2018.